Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [617.265] NUDIFICATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "nudify" means the process by which: new text end new text begin (1) an image or video is altered or generated to depict an intimate part not depicted in an original unaltered image or video of an identifiable individual; and new text end new text begin (2) the altered or generated image or video is so realistic that a reasonable person would believe that the intimate part belongs to the identifiable individual. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Criminal penalty. new text end new text begin A person who intentionally nudifies an image or video of another person while knowing or having reason to know that the subject of the image or video did not consent to the nudification is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than two years or to payment of a fine of not more than $4,000, or both. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end